Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXVII Special Proceedings
Penalties

416.990.
Penalties.

Any person who places any obstruction,
including poles, wires, signboards, fences, gas, water, sewerage, oil or other
pipelines, on any part of the right-of-way of any state highway, or under
any such highway, before obtaining the permit required by subsection (3) of
KRS

416.140

, or who fails to remove any obstruction when given notice as provided
in that subsection, shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor
more than one hundred dollars ($100), and each day the obstruction is continued
without a permit or after such notice to remove shall constitute a separate
offense.

History.

1599c-1.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, Prac. & Proc. Forms, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Condemnation (Eminent Domain), § 307.00.